RBMT/ling073-div/apertium-div.div.twol
Alphabet
ޤ ޢ ޭ ޜ ޓ ޠ ޫ ީ ޯ ާ ށ ޑ ﷲ ޣ ޙ ޛ ޚ ޅ ޡ ޘ ޝ ޥ ޞ ޏ ޟ
 ް އ  ެ ރ ތ ޔ  ު ި ން ނު  ޮ ޕ ަ ސ ދ ފ ގ ހ ޖ ކ ލ ޒ × ޗ ވ ބ ނ މ

 %{H%}:0  %{C%}:0 %{I%}:0     
 %{H%}:އި  %{C%}:އި %{I%}:ި 
 %{H%}:އު  %{C%}:އެ %{I%}:ު
          %{C%}:ު

 %{S%}:އީ
 %{S%}:އޭ

 %{X%}:0  
 %>:0 % 
;

Sets

Vowel =  ަ  ާ  ެ  ޭ  ި  ީ  ޮ  ޯ  ު  ޫ ;
Consonant = ހ ށ ނ ރ ބ ޅ ކ ވ މ ފ ދ ތ ލ ގ ޏ ސ ޑ ޒ ޓ ޔ ޕ ޖ ޗ ;
Arabic    = ޙ ޚ ޢ ޣ ޥ ޛ ޘ ޡ ޤ ޝ ޞ ޟ ޜ ޠ ﷲ ;
Placeholders = އ  ް ;

ConsonantsWithPlaceholders = ރް ން ;
ConsonantsWithU            = ރު ނު ;

Rules

"Change {H} to u after empty vowel"
%{H%}:ު <=> ް: %>: _ ;

"Change {H} to nohing after /i/ and /u/"
%{H%}:0 <=> Vx: %>: _ ;
      where Vx in ( ި ު );

"Change {H} to i after vowels except /i/ and /u/"
%{H%}:އި <=> Vx: %>: _ ;
      where Vx in (  ަ  ާ  ެ  ޭ  ީ  ޮ  ޯ  ޫ );

"Delete empty vowel before /u/"
ް:0 <=> _ %>: :ު ;

"Change {C} to nothing after vowels besides /i/ and /a/ and /e/"
%{C%}:0 <=> Vx: %>: _ ;
      where Vx in (  ާ   ޭ   ީ  ޮ  ޯ  ު  ޫ );
 
"Change {C} to /i/ after /a/"
%{C%}:އި <=> Vx: %>: _ ;
      where Vx in ( ަ );

"Change {C} to long /i/ after /i/"
%{C%}:ީ <=>ި: %>: _ ;

"Change {C} to u after empty vowel"
%{C%}:ު <=> ް: %>: _ ;

"Delete /i/ before long /i/"
ި:0 <=> _ %>: :ީ ;

"Delete empty vowel before > + empty consonant"
 ް:0 <=> _ %>: އ: ;
        _ :0 %>: އ: ;

"Delete empty consonant after empty vowel + >"
އ:0 <=>  ް: %>: _ ;
         ް: :0 %>: _ ;

"S-lenition: /s/ changed to /h/ before a vowel"
ސ:ހ <=>  _  ް: %>: Consonant: ;
         _  ް: %>: އ: ;
         _  ް: %>: :Vowel ;
    except
        މ:  ު:  ދ:  ަ:  އ:  ް:  ރ:  ި:  _  ް: %>: %{H%}: ނ:  ް: ; 
        !_  ް: %{X%}: %>: ;

"Realise {I} as /i/ when after /a/ or /e/"
%{I%}:ި <=> Vx: %>: _ ;
      where Vx in ( ަ  ެ );

"Change {I} to /u/ after empty vowel"
%{I%}:ު <=> ް: %>: _ ;

"Change {S} to /aa/ after /a/"
%{S%}:ާ <=> ަ: %>: _ ;

"Delete /a/ before /aa/"
ަ:0 <=> _ %>: :ާ ;

"Change {S} to /ee/ after /e/"
%{S%}:ޭ <=> ެ: %>: _ ;

"Change {C} to /ee/ after /e/"
%{C%}:ޭ <=> ެ: %>: _ ;

"Delete /e/ before /ee/"
ެ:0 <=> _ %>: :ޭ ;

!"Delete /u/ before another empty consonant and another vowel"
!ު:0 <=> _ %>: އ: Vowel: ;

!"Delete empty consonant when it's empty before and follows by a vowel "
!އ:0 <=> :0 %>: _ Vowel: ;


! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
